Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2609
Sales of swine; contracts allowed; conditions.

Section 54-2607 does not apply to any contract to purchase swine at a certain date or time if the following requirements are met:

(1) The difference in price is based on: (a) A payment method specifying prices paid for criteria relating to carcass merit; or (b) actual and quantifiable costs related to transporting and acquiring the swine by the packer;

(2) The packer reports the payment information required under section 54-2613, including the payment method specifying prices paid for criteria relating to carcass merit and transportation and acquisition costs;

(3) The packer reports the information required under section 54-2613, including the price to be paid for swine to be delivered on specified delivery dates or times; and

(4) An offer to enter into a contract for the delivery of swine, according to the same terms and conditions, is made to other sellers.

Laws 1999, LB 835, § 9.